Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 80. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY, A MEMBER OF THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

Sec. 80.01. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

(2) "University" means the university established under this chapter as Stephen F. Austin State University, a member of The University of Texas System.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.02. REFERENCE TO STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY. A reference in law to Stephen F. Austin State University means Stephen F. Austin State University, a member of The University of Texas System.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.03. ESTABLISHMENT; SCOPE. (a) Stephen F. Austin State University, a member of The University of Texas System, is a general academic teaching institution in Nacogdoches, Texas, under the governance, management, and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

(b) As necessary to achieve the maximum operating efficiency of the university, the board shall provide for the organization, administration, and location of the university and of the colleges, schools, and other institutions and entities of the university.

(c) The authority of the board under this section to achieve the maximum operating efficiency of the university and to provide for the organization, administration, and location of the university and of the colleges, schools, and other institutions and entities of the university prevails over other law.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.04. COURSES AND DEGREES. (a) The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered at leading American universities and may award those degrees, including bachelor's, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents.

(b) The board shall award degrees in the name of the university.

(c) A degree program may not be instituted without the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, except that the university may offer any degree program previously approved for Stephen F. Austin State University or expressly authorized by this chapter or other law.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.05. UNIVERSITY OF THE FIRST CLASS. The board shall make any other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the university as may be necessary for the conduct of the university as a university of the first class.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.06. FACILITIES. The board shall provide for adequate physical facilities for use by the university.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.07. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may solicit, accept, and administer, on terms and conditions acceptable to the board, gifts, grants, or donations of any kind and from any source for use by the university.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.08. JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may make joint faculty appointments to positions in the university and to positions in other institutions under the governance of the board.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.

Sec. 80.09. PARTICIPATION IN PERMANENT UNIVERSITY FUND. The legislature finds that the university is an institution of higher education "created at a later date" for purposes of Section 18(c), Article VII, Texas Constitution. Accordingly, the university is entitled to participate in the funding provided by Section 18, Article VII, Texas Constitution, to the same extent as similar component institutions of The University of Texas System.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 1055), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2023.